Hawaii statutes.
§658H-3 Scope. (a) Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (b) or (c), this chapter applies to a
mediation in which:

(1) The mediation parties are required to mediate by
statute or court or administrative rule or referred to mediation by a court, administrative
agency, or arbitrator;

(2) The mediation parties and the mediator agree to
mediate in a record that demonstrates an expectation that mediation
communications will be privileged against disclosure; or

(3) The mediation parties use as a mediator an
individual who holds himself or herself out as a mediator or the mediation is
provided by a person who holds himself or herself out as providing mediation.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to a
mediation:

(1) Relating to the establishment, negotiation,
administration, or termination of a collective bargaining relationship;

(2) Relating to a dispute that is pending under or is
part of the processes established by a collective bargaining agreement, except
that this chapter shall apply to a mediation arising out of a dispute that has
been filed with an administrative agency or court;

(3) Conducted by a judge on a case; or

(4) Conducted under the auspices of:

(A) A primary or secondary school if all the
mediation parties are students; or

(B) A correctional institution for youths if
all the mediation parties are residents of that institution.

(c) If the mediation parties agree in advance
in a signed record, or a record of proceeding reflects agreement by the
mediation parties, that all or part of a mediation is not privileged, the
privileges under sections 658H-4 through 658H-6 shall not apply to the
mediation or part agreed upon. However, sections 658H-4 through 658H-6 shall
apply to a mediation communication made by a person that has not received
actual notice of the agreement before the mediation communication is made. [L
2013, c 284, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 5, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next